Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.69, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Classifications. (a) The following government data of the Department of Public Safety are private data: (1) medical data on driving instructors, licensed drivers, and applicants for parking certificates and special license plates issued to physically disabled persons; (2) other data on holders of a disability certificate under section 169.345, except that (i) data that are not medical data may be released to law enforcement agencies, and (ii) data necessary for enforcement of sections 169.345 and 169.346 may be released to parking enforcement employees or parking enforcement agents of statutory or home rule charter cities and towns; (3) Social Security numbers in driver's license and motor vehicle registration records, except that Social Security numbers must be provided to the Department of Revenue for purposes of tax administration, the Department of Labor and Industry for purposes of workers' compensation administration and enforcement, the judicial branch for purposes of debt collection, and the Department of Natural Resources for purposes of license application administration, and except that the last four digits of the Social Security number must be provided to the Department of Human Services for purposes of recovery of Minnesota health care program benefits paid; (4) data on persons listed as standby or temporary custodians under section 171.07, subdivision 11, except that the data must be released to: (i) law enforcement agencies for the purpose of verifying that an individual is a designated caregiver; or (ii) law enforcement agencies who state that the license holder is unable to communicate at that time and that the information is necessary for notifying the designated caregiver of the need to care for a child of the license holder; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) race and ethnicity data on driver's license holders and identification card holders under section 171.06, subdivision 3. The Department of Public Safety Office of Traffic Safety is authorized to receive race and ethnicity data from Driver and Vehicle Services for only the purposes of research, evaluation, and public reportsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) data on individuals created, collected, received, stored, used, or maintained by the Department of Public Safety for the purposes of research. new text end The department may release the Social Security number only as provided in clause (3) and must not sell or otherwise provide individual Social Security numbers or lists of Social Security numbers for any other purpose. new text begin (b) For the purpose of paragraph (a), clause (6), "research" has the meaning given in Code of Federal Regulations, title 28, sections 22.2(c) and 46.102(d), and includes but is not limited to data collection through surveys, focus groups, and interviews for the purpose of advancing knowledge in a particular area, including program evaluation. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The following government data of the Department of Public Safety are confidential data: data concerning an individual's driving ability when that data is received from a member of the individual's family. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.6905, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 39. new text end new text begin Office for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives. new text end new text begin Data related to victim and family support are governed by section 299A.85, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (14). new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.6905, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40. new text end new text begin Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and Girls. new text end new text begin Data related to victim and family support are governed by section 299A.90, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (22). new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.871, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Crime victims. (a) Crime victim notice of release. Data on crime victims who request notice of an offender's release are classified under section 611A.06. (b) Sex offender HIV tests. Results of HIV tests of sex offenders under section 611A.19, subdivision 2, are classified under that section. deleted text begin (c) Battered women. Data on battered women maintained by grantees for emergency shelter and support services for battered women are governed by section 611A.32, subdivision 5. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Victims of domestic abuse. Data on deleted text begin battered women anddeleted text end victims of domestic abuse maintained by grantees deleted text begin and recipients of per diem paymentsdeleted text end for emergency shelter deleted text begin for battered womendeleted text end and support services deleted text begin for battered women and victims of domestic abusedeleted text end are governed by sections 611A.32, subdivision 5, and 611A.371, subdivision 3. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Personal history; internal auditing. Certain personal history and internal auditing data is classified by section 611A.46. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Crime victim claims for reimbursement. Claims and supporting documents filed by crime victims seeking reimbursement are classified under section 611A.57, subdivision 6. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Crime Victim Oversight Act. Data maintained by the commissioner of public safety under the Crime Victim Oversight Act are classified under section 611A.74, subdivision 2. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end Victim identity data. Data relating to the identity of the victims of certain criminal sexual conduct is governed by section 609.3471. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end Victim notification. Data on victims requesting a notice of release of an arrested or detained person are classified under sections 629.72 and 629.73. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end Immigration status certification. Disclosure of the immigration status of a crime victim and the classification of that data is governed by section 611A.95, subdivision 4. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.362, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Generally. (a) The commissioner shall make grants to eligible organizations for programs to provide education and training services to targeted youth. The purpose of these programs is to provide specialized training and work experience for targeted youth who have not been served effectively by the current educational system. The programs are to include a work experience component with work projects that result in the rehabilitation, improvement, or construction of (1) residential units for the homeless; (2) improvements to the energy efficiency and environmental health of residential units and other green jobs purposes; (3) facilities to support community garden projects; or (4) education, social service, or health facilities which are owned by a public agency or a private nonprofit organization. (b) Eligible facilities must principally provide services to homeless or low income individuals and families, and include the following: (1) Head Start or day care centers, including playhouses or similar incidental structures; (2) homeless, deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abusenew text end , or other shelters; (3) transitional housing and tiny houses; (4) youth or senior citizen centers; (5) community health centers; and (6) community garden facilities. Two or more eligible organizations may jointly apply for a grant. The commissioner shall administer the grant program. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 119A.37, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Additional services. Each parenting time center may provide parenting and child development classes, and offer support groups to participating custodial parents and hold regular classes designed to assist children who have experienced domestic violence and abuse. Each parenting time center must have available an individual knowledgeable about or experienced in the provision of services to deleted text begin battered women anddeleted text end domestic abuse victims on its staff, its board of directors, or otherwise available to it for consultation. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.22, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Violence prevention curriculum. (a) The commissioner of education, in consultation with the commissioners of health and human services, state minority councils, deleted text begin battered women's anddeleted text end domestic abuse programsdeleted text begin , battered women'sdeleted text end new text begin andnew text end shelters, sexual assault centers, new text begin and new text end representatives of religious communities, deleted text begin and the assistant commissioner of the Office of Drug Policy and Violence Prevention,deleted text end shall assist districts on request in developing or implementing a violence prevention program for students in kindergarten to grade 12 that can be integrated into existing curriculum. The purpose of the program is to help students learn how to resolve conflicts within their families and communities in nonviolent, effective ways. (b) Each district is encouraged to integrate into its existing curriculum a program for violence prevention that includes at least: (1) a comprehensive, accurate, and age appropriate curriculum on violence prevention, nonviolent conflict resolution, sexual, racial, and cultural harassment, self-protection, and student hazing that promotes equality, respect, understanding, effective communication, individual responsibility, thoughtful decision making, positive conflict resolution, useful coping skills, critical thinking, listening and watching skills, and personal safety; (2) planning materials, guidelines, and other accurate information on preventing physical and emotional violence, identifying and reducing the incidence of sexual, racial, and cultural harassment, and reducing child abuse, including physical abuse, and neglect; (3) a special parent education component of early childhood family education programs to prevent child abuse and neglect and to promote positive parenting skills, giving priority to services and outreach programs for at-risk families; (4) involvement of parents and other community members, including the clergy, business representatives, civic leaders, local elected officials, law enforcement officials, and the county attorney; (5) collaboration with local community services, agencies, and organizations that assist in violence intervention or prevention, including family-based services, crisis services, life management skills services, case coordination services, mental health services, and early intervention services; (6) collaboration among districts and service cooperatives; (7) targeting early adolescents for prevention efforts, especially early adolescents whose personal circumstances may lead to violent or harassing behavior; (8) opportunities for teachers to receive in-service training or attend other programs on strategies or curriculum designed to assist students in intervening in or preventing violence in school and at home; and (9) administrative policies that reflect, and a staff that models, nonviolent behaviors that do not display or condone sexual, racial, or cultural harassment or student hazing. (c) The department may provide assistance at a neutral site to a nonpublic school participating in a district's program. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142G.12, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. 30-day residency requirement. An assistance unit is considered to have established residency in this state only when a child or caregiver has resided in this state for at least 30 consecutive days with the intention of making the person's home here and not for any temporary purpose. The birth of a child in Minnesota to a member of the assistance unit does not automatically establish the residency in this state under this subdivision of the other members of the assistance unit. Time spent in a shelter for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end shall count toward satisfying the 30-day residency requirement. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142G.53, is amended to read: 142G.53 FAMILY VIOLENCE WAIVER CRITERIA. (a) In order to qualify for a family violence waiver, an individual must provide documentation of past or current family violence which may prevent the individual from participating in certain employment activities. (b) The following items may be considered acceptable documentation or verification of family violence: (1) police, government agency, or court records; (2) a statement from deleted text begin a battered women'sdeleted text end new text begin domestic abusenew text end shelter staff with knowledge of the circumstances; (3) a statement from a sexual assault or domestic violence advocate with knowledge of the circumstances; or (4) a statement from professionals from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance for the abuse. (c) A claim of family violence may also be documented by a sworn statement from the applicant or participant and a sworn statement from any other person with knowledge of the circumstances or credible evidence that supports the client's statement. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 201.061, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Election day registration. (a) An individual who is eligible to vote may register or update a registration on election day by appearing in person at the polling place for the precinct in which the individual maintains residence, by completing a registration application, making an oath in the form prescribed by the secretary of state and providing proof of residence. An individual may prove residence for purposes of registering or updating a registration by: (1) presenting a driver's license or Minnesota identification card issued pursuant to section 171.07; (2) presenting any document approved by the secretary of state as proper identification; (3) presenting a current student fee statement that contains the student's valid address in the precinct together with a picture identification card; or (4) having a voter who is registered to vote in the precinct, or an employee who provides proof that they are employed by and working in a residential facility in the precinct and vouching for a resident in the facility, sign an oath in the presence of the election judge vouching that the voter or employee personally knows that the individual is a resident of the precinct. A voter who has been vouched for on election day may not sign a proof of residence oath vouching for any other individual on that election day. An election judge may not sign a proof of residence oath vouching for any individual who appears in the precinct where the election judge is working unless the election judge personally knows the individual is a resident of the precinct. A voter who is registered to vote in the precinct may sign up to eight proof-of-residence oaths on any election day. This limitation does not apply to an employee of a residential facility described in this clause. The secretary of state shall provide a form for election judges to use in recording the number of individuals for whom a voter signs proof-of-residence oaths on election day. The form must include space for the maximum number of individuals for whom a voter may sign proof-of-residence oaths. For each proof-of-residence oath, the form must include a statement that the individual: (i) is registered to vote in the precinct or is an employee of a residential facility in the precinct, (ii) personally knows that the voter is a resident of the precinct, and (iii) is making the statement on oath. The form must include a space for the voter's printed name, signature, telephone number, and address. The oath required by this subdivision and Minnesota Rules, part 8200.9939, must be attached to the voter registration application. (b) The secretary of state must publish guidance for residential facilities and residential facility employees on the vouching process and the requirements of this subdivision. (c) "Residential facility" means transitional housing as defined in section 256K.48, subdivision 1; a supervised living facility licensed by the commissioner of health under section 144.50, subdivision 6; a nursing home as defined in section 144A.01, subdivision 5; an assisted living facility licensed by the commissioner of health under chapter 144G; a veterans home operated by the board of directors of the Minnesota Veterans Homes under chapter 198; a residence licensed by the commissioner of human services to provide a residential program as defined in section 245A.02, subdivision 14; a residential facility for persons with a developmental disability licensed by the commissioner of human services under section 252.28; setting authorized to provide housing support as defined in section 256I.03, subdivision 10a; deleted text begin a shelter for battered womendeleted text end new text begin emergency shelter services for domestic abuse victimsnew text end as defined in section deleted text begin 611A.37, subdivision 4deleted text end new text begin 611A.31, subdivision 3new text end ; a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter or dwelling designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless; a facility where a provider operates a residential treatment program as defined in section 245.462, subdivision 23; or a facility where a provider operates an adult foster care program as defined in section 245A.02, subdivision 6c. (d) For tribal band members, an individual may prove residence for purposes of registering or updating a registration by: (1) presenting an identification card issued by the tribal government of a tribe recognized by the Bureau of Indian Affairs, United States Department of the Interior, that contains the name, address, signature, and picture of the individual; or (2) presenting an identification card issued by the tribal government of a tribe recognized by the Bureau of Indian Affairs, United States Department of the Interior, that contains the name, signature, and picture of the individual and also presenting one of the documents listed in Minnesota Rules, part 8200.5100, subpart 2, item B. (e) A county, school district, or municipality may require that an election judge responsible for election day registration initial each completed registration application. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.06, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Delivery of ballots. (a) The county auditor, municipal clerk, school district clerk, or full-time clerk of any city or town administering an election pursuant to section 203B.05, shall mail absentee ballots to voters on the permanent absentee ballot list pursuant to section 203B.04, subdivision 5, on the following timelines: (1) except as otherwise provided by this section, at least 46 days before each regularly scheduled primary and general election and each special primary and special election; (2) as soon as practicable for a special election held pursuant to section 204D.19, subdivisions 2 and 3; and (3) at least 30 days before a town general election held in March. (b) The commissioner of corrections must provide the secretary of state with a list of the names and mailing addresses of state adult correctional facilities. An application for an absentee ballot that provides an address included on the list provided by the commissioner of corrections must not be accepted and an absentee ballot must not be provided to the applicant. The county auditor or municipal clerk must promptly transmit a copy of the application to the county attorney. The Department of Corrections must implement procedures to ensure that absentee ballots issued under this chapter are not received or mailed by offenders incarcerated at state adult correctional facilities. (c) If an application for absentee ballots is accepted at a time when absentee ballots are not yet available for distribution, the county auditor, or municipal clerk accepting the application shall file it and as soon as absentee ballots are available for distribution shall mail them to the address specified in the application. If an application for absentee ballots is accepted when absentee ballots are available for distribution, the county auditor or municipal clerk accepting the application shall promptly: (1) mail the ballots to the voter whose signature appears on the application if the application is submitted by mail and does not request commercial shipping under clause (2); (2) ship the ballots to the voter using a commercial shipper requested by the voter at the voter's expense; (3) deliver the absentee ballots directly to the voter if the application is submitted in person; or (4) deliver the absentee ballots in a sealed transmittal envelope to an agent who has been designated to bring the ballots, as provided in section 203B.11, subdivision 4, to a voter who would have difficulty getting to the polls because of incapacitating health reasons, or who is disabled, or who is a patient in a health care facility, a resident of an assisted living facility licensed under chapter 144G, a participant in a residential program for adults licensed under section 245A.02, subdivision 14, or a resident of a shelter for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end as defined in section deleted text begin 611A.37, subdivision 4deleted text end new text begin 611A.31, subdivision 2new text end . (d) If an application does not indicate the election for which absentee ballots are sought, the county auditor or municipal clerk shall mail or deliver only the ballots for the next election occurring after receipt of the application. Only one set of ballots may be mailed, shipped, or delivered to an applicant for any election, except as provided in section 203B.121, subdivision 2, or when a replacement ballot has been requested by the voter for a ballot that has been spoiled or lost in transit. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Generally. (a) Each full-time municipal clerk or school district clerk who has authority under section 203B.05 to administer absentee voting laws must designate election judges to deliver absentee ballots in accordance with this section. The county auditor must also designate election judges to perform the duties in this section. A ballot may be delivered only to an eligible voter who is a temporary or permanent resident or patient in one of the following facilities located in the municipality in which the voter maintains residence: a health care facility, hospital, or veterans home operated by the board of directors of the Minnesota veterans homes under chapter 198. The ballots must be delivered by two election judges, each of whom is affiliated with a different major political party. When the election judges deliver or return ballots as provided in this section, they must travel together in the same vehicle. Both election judges must be present when an applicant completes the certificate of eligibility and marks the absentee ballots, and may assist an applicant as provided in section 204C.15. The election judges must deposit the return envelopes containing the marked absentee ballots in a sealed container and return them to the clerk on the same day that they are delivered and marked. (b) At the discretion of a full-time municipal clerk, school district clerk, or county auditor, absentee ballots may be delivered in the same manner as prescribed in paragraph (a) to a shelter for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end as defined in section deleted text begin 611A.37, subdivision 4deleted text end new text begin 611A.31, subdivision 2new text end , or to an assisted living facility licensed under chapter 144G. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256D.02, subdivision 12a, is amended to read: Subd. 12a. Resident. (a) For purposes of eligibility for general assistance, a person must be a resident of this state. (b) A "resident" is a person living in the state for at least 30 days with the intention of making the person's home here and not for any temporary purpose. Time spent in a shelter for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end shall count toward satisfying the 30-day residency requirement. All applicants for these programs are required to demonstrate the requisite intent and can do so in any of the following ways: (1) by showing that the applicant maintains a residence at a verified address, other than a place of public accommodation. An applicant may verify a residence address by presenting a valid state driver's license, a state identification card, a voter registration card, a rent receipt, a statement by the landlord, apartment manager, or homeowner verifying that the individual is residing at the address, or other form of verification approved by the commissioner; or (2) by verifying residence according to Minnesota Rules, part 9500.1219, subpart 3, item C. (c) For general assistance, a county shall waive the 30-day residency requirement where unusual hardship would result from denial of general assistance. For purposes of this subdivision, "unusual hardship" means the applicant is without shelter or is without available resources for food. The county agency must report to the commissioner within 30 days on any waiver granted under this section. The county shall not deny an application solely because the applicant does not meet at least one of the criteria in this subdivision, but shall continue to process the application and leave the application pending until the residency requirement is met or until eligibility or ineligibility is established. (d) For purposes of paragraph (c), the following definitions apply (1) "metropolitan statistical area" is as defined by the United States Census Bureau; (2) "shelter" includes any shelter that is located within the metropolitan statistical area containing the county and for which the applicant is eligible, provided the applicant does not have to travel more than 20 miles to reach the shelter and has access to transportation to the shelter. Clause (2) does not apply to counties in the Minneapolis-St. Paul metropolitan statistical area. (e) Migrant workers as defined in section 142G.02 are exempt from the residency requirements of this section, provided the migrant worker provides verification that the migrant family worked in this state within the last 12 months and earned at least $1,000 in gross wages during the time the migrant worker worked in this state. (f) For purposes of eligibility for emergency general assistance, the 30-day residency requirement under this section shall not be waived. (g) If any provision of this subdivision is enjoined from implementation or found unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining provisions shall remain valid and shall be given full effect. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256G.02, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Excluded time. "Excluded time" means: (1) any period an applicant spends in a hospital, sanitarium, nursing home, shelter other than an emergency shelter, halfway house, foster home, community residential setting licensed under chapter 245D, semi-independent living domicile or services program, residential facility offering care, board and lodging facility or other institution for the hospitalization or care of human beings, as defined in section 144.50, 144A.01, or 245A.02, subdivision 14; maternity home, deleted text begin battered women'sdeleted text end shelternew text begin for domestic abuse victimsnew text end , or correctional facility; or any facility based on an emergency hold under section 253B.05, subdivisions 1 and 2; (2) any period an applicant spends on a placement basis in a training and habilitation program, including: a rehabilitation facility or work or employment program as defined in section 268A.01; semi-independent living services provided under section 252.275, and chapter 245D; or day training and habilitation programs; (3) any period an applicant is receiving assisted living services, integrated community supports, or day support services; and (4) any placement for a person with an indeterminate commitment, including independent living. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256G.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. No durational test. Except as otherwise provided in sections 142G.12; 142G.78; 256B.056, subdivision 1; and 256D.02, subdivision 12a, for purposes of this chapter, no waiting period is required before securing county or state residence. A person cannot, however, gain residence while physically present in an excluded time facility unless otherwise specified in this chapter or in a federal regulation controlling a federally funded human service; children, youth, and families; or direct care and treatment program. Interstate migrants who enter a shelter for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end directly from another state can gain residency while in the facility provided the person can provide documentation that the person is a victim of domestic abuse and the county determines that the placement is appropriate. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 257.75, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Paternity educational materials. The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall prepare educational materials for new and prospective parents that describe the benefits and effects of establishing paternity. The materials must include a description and comparison of the procedures for establishment of paternity through a recognition of parentage under this section and an adjudication of paternity under sections 257.51 to 257.74. The commissioner shall consider the use of innovative audio or visual approaches to the presentation of the materials to facilitate understanding and presentation. In preparing the materials, the commissioner shall consult with child advocates and support workers, deleted text begin battered women's advocates anddeleted text end advocates for domestic abuse victims, social service providers, educators, attorneys, hospital representatives, and people who work with parents in making decisions related to paternity. The commissioner shall consult with representatives of communities of color. On and after January 1, 1994, the commissioner shall make the materials available without cost to hospitals, requesting agencies, and other persons for distribution to new parents. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment of team. A county shall establish a multidisciplinary child protection team that may include but is not limited to the director of the local welfare agency or designees, the county attorney or designees, the county sheriff or designees, representatives of health and education, representatives of mental health, representatives of agencies providing specialized services or responding to youth who experience or are at risk of experiencing sex or labor trafficking or sexual exploitation, or other appropriate human services, children's services, or community-based agencies, and parent groups. As used in this section, a "community-based agency" may include, but is not limited to, schools, social services agencies, family service and mental health collaboratives, children's advocacy centers, early childhood and family education programs, Head Start, or other agencies serving children and families. A member of the team must be designated as the lead person of the team responsible for the planning process to develop standards for the team's activities with deleted text begin battered women's anddeleted text end domestic abuse programs and services. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.85, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Duties. new text begin (a) new text end The office has the following duties: (1) advocate in the legislature for legislation that will facilitate the accomplishment of the mandates identified in the Missing and Murdered Indigenous Women Task Force report; (2) advocate for state agencies to take actions to facilitate the accomplishment of the mandates identified in the Missing and Murdered Indigenous Women Task Force report; (3) develop recommendations for legislative and agency actions to address injustice in the criminal justice system's response to the cases of missing and murdered Indigenous relatives; (4) facilitate research to refine the mandates in the Missing and Murdered Indigenous Women Task Force report and to assess the potential efficacy, feasibility, and impact of the recommendations; (5) develop tools and processes to evaluate the implementation and impact of the efforts of the office; (6) track and collect Minnesota data on missing and murdered indigenous women, children, and relatives, and provide statistics upon public or legislative inquiry; (7) facilitate technical assistance for local and Tribal law enforcement agencies during active missing and murdered Indigenous relatives cases; (8) conduct case reviews and report on the results of case reviews for the following types of missing and murdered Indigenous relatives cases: cold cases for missing Indigenous people and death investigation review for cases of Indigenous people ruled as suicide or overdose under suspicious circumstances; (9) conduct case reviews of the prosecution and sentencing for cases where a perpetrator committed a violent or exploitative crime against an Indigenous person. These case reviews should identify those cases where the perpetrator is a repeat offender; (10) prepare draft legislation as necessary to allow the office access to the data required for the office to conduct the reviews required in this section and advocate for passage of that legislation; (11) review sentencing guidelines for missing and murdered Indigenous women-related crimes, recommend changes if needed, and advocate for consistent implementation of the guidelines across Minnesota courts; (12) develop and maintain communication with relevant divisions in the Department of Public Safety regarding any cases involving missing and murdered Indigenous relatives and on procedures for investigating cases involving missing and murdered Indigenous relatives; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (13) coordinate, as relevant, with the Bureau of Indian Affairs' Cold Case Office through Operation Lady Justice and other federal efforts, as well as efforts in neighboring states and Canada. This recommendation pertains to state efforts. Tribes are sovereign nations that have the right to determine if and how they will coordinate with these other effortsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (14) provide case support to victims and families of missing or murdered Indigenous relatives or their designated family representative or the reporting person. Case support includes but is not limited to providing support and guidance during the law enforcement investigation; facilitating communication with criminal justice agencies and other government entities; compiling relevant information about ongoing cases; and providing information, referrals, and other types of support. new text end new text begin (b) As used in this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "reporting person" means the relative or nonrelative person who completed a case intake form with the office; and new text end new text begin (2) "victim" has the meaning given in section 611A.01. new text end new text begin (c) Data created, collected, received, stored, used, or maintained by the office related to paragraph (a), clause (14), are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.90, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Duties. (a) The office has the following duties: (1) advocate in the legislature for legislation that will facilitate the accomplishment of mandates identified in the report of the Task Force on Missing and Murdered African American Women; (2) advocate for state agencies to take actions to facilitate the accomplishment of mandates identified in the report of the Task Force on Missing and Murdered African American Women; (3) develop recommendations for legislative and agency actions to address injustice in the criminal justice system's response to cases of missing and murdered Black women and girls; (4) facilitate research to refine the mandates in the report of the Task Force on Missing and Murdered African American Women and to assess the potential efficacy, feasibility, and impact of the recommendations; (5) collect data on missing person and homicide cases involving Black women and girls, including the total number of cases, the rate at which the cases are solved, the length of time the cases remain open, and a comparison to similar cases involving different demographic groups; (6) collect data on Amber Alerts, including the total number of Amber Alerts issued, the total number of Amber Alerts that involve Black girls, and the outcome of cases involving Amber Alerts disaggregated by the child's race and sex; (7) collect data on reports of missing Black girls, including the number classified as voluntary runaways, and a comparison to similar cases involving different demographic groups; (8) analyze and assess the intersection between cases involving missing and murdered Black women and girls and labor trafficking and sex trafficking; (9) develop recommendations for legislative, agency, and community actions to address the intersection between cases involving missing and murdered Black women and girls and labor trafficking and sex trafficking; (10) analyze and assess the intersection between cases involving murdered Black women and girls and domestic violence, including prior instances of domestic violence within the family or relationship, whether an offender had prior convictions for domestic assault or related offenses, and whether the offender used a firearm in the murder or any prior instances of domestic assault; (11) develop recommendations for legislative, agency, and community actions to address the intersection between cases involving murdered Black women and girls and domestic violence; (12) develop tools and processes to evaluate the implementation and impact of the efforts of the office; (13) track and collect Minnesota data on missing and murdered Black women and girls, and provide statistics upon public or legislative inquiry; (14) facilitate technical assistance for local and Tribal law enforcement agencies during active cases involving missing and murdered Black women and girls; (15) conduct case reviews and report on the results of case reviews for the following types of cases involving missing and murdered Black women and girls: cold cases for missing Black women and girls and death investigation review for cases of Black women and girls ruled as suicide or overdose under suspicious circumstances; (16) conduct case reviews of the prosecution and sentencing for cases where a perpetrator committed a violent or exploitative crime against a Black woman or girl. These case reviews must identify those cases where the perpetrator is a repeat offender; (17) prepare draft legislation as necessary to allow the office access to the data necessary for the office to conduct the reviews required in this section and advocate for passage of that legislation; (18) review sentencing guidelines for crimes related to missing and murdered Black women and girls, recommend changes if needed, and advocate for consistent implementation of the guidelines across Minnesota courts; (19) develop and maintain communication with relevant divisions in the Department of Public Safety, including but not limited to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, regarding any cases involving missing and murdered Black women and girls and on procedures for investigating cases involving missing and murdered Black women and girls; (20) consult with the Council for Minnesotans of African Heritage established in section 15.0145; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (21) coordinate, as relevant, with federal efforts, and efforts in neighboring states and Canadadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (22) provide case support to victims and families of missing or murdered Black women and girls or their designated family representative or the reporting person. Case support includes but is not limited to providing support and guidance during the law enforcement investigation; facilitating communication with criminal justice agencies and other government entities; compiling relevant information about ongoing cases; and providing information, referrals, and other types of support. new text end (b) As used in this subdivision: (1) "labor trafficking" has the meaning given in section 609.281, subdivision 5; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (2) "reporting person" means the relative or nonrelative person who completed a case intake form with the office; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end "sex trafficking" has the meaning given in section 609.321, subdivision 7adeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) "victim" has the meaning given in section 611A.01. new text end new text begin (c) Data created, collected, received, stored, used, or maintained by the office related to paragraph (a), clause (22), are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518B.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Standards for domestic abuse counseling programs and domestic abuse educational programs. (a) Domestic abuse counseling or educational programs that provide group or class sessions for court-ordered domestic abuse offenders must provide documentation to the probation department or the court on program policies and how the program meets the criteria contained in paragraphs (b) to (l). (b) Programs shall require offenders and abusing parties to attend a minimum of 24 sessions or 36 hours of programming, unless a probation agent has recommended fewer sessions. The documentation provided to the probation department or the court must specify the length of the program that offenders are required to complete. (c) Programs must have a written policy requiring that counselors and facilitators report to the court and to the offender's probation or corrections officer any threats of violence made by the offender or abusing party, acts of violence by the offender or abusing party, violation of court orders by the offender or abusing party, and violation of program rules that resulted in the offender's or abusing party's termination from the program. Programs shall have written policies requiring that counselors and facilitators hold offenders and abusing parties solely responsible for their behavior. Programs shall have written policies requiring that counselors and facilitators be violence free in their own lives. (d) Each program shall conduct an intake process with each offender or abusing party. This intake process shall look for chemical dependency problems and possible risks the offender or abusing party might pose to self or others. The program must have policies regarding referral of a chemically dependent offender or abusing party to a chemical dependency treatment center. If the offender or abusing party poses a risk to self or others, the program shall report this information to the court, the probation or corrections officer, and the victim. (e) If the offender or abusing party is reported back to the court or is terminated from the program, the program shall notify the victim of the circumstances unless the victim requests otherwise. (f) Programs shall require court-ordered offenders and abusing parties to sign a release of information authorizing communication regarding the offender's or abusing party's progress in the program to the court, the offender's probation or corrections officer, other providers, and the victim. The offender or abusing party may not enter the program if the offender does not sign a release. (g) If a counselor or facilitator contacts the victim, the counselor or facilitator must not elicit any information that the victim does not want to provide. A counselor or facilitator who contacts a victim shall (1) notify the victim of the right not to provide any information, (2) notify the victim of how any information provided will be used and with whom it will be shared, and (3) obtain the victim's permission before eliciting information from the victim or sharing information with anyone other than staff of the counseling program. Programs shall have written policies requiring that counselors and facilitators inform victims of the confidentiality of information as provided by this subdivision. Programs must maintain separate files for information pertaining to the offender or abusing party and to the victim. If a counselor or facilitator contacts a victim, the counselor or facilitator shall provide the victim with referral information for support services. (h) Programs shall have written policies forbidding program staff from disclosing any confidential communication made by the offender or abusing party without the consent of the offender or abusing party, except that programs must warn a potential victim of imminent danger based upon information provided by an offender or abusing party. (i) The counseling program or educational program must provide services in a group setting, unless the offender or abusing party would be inappropriate in a group setting. Programs must provide separate sessions for male and female offenders and abusing parties. (j) Programs shall have written policies forbidding program staff from offering or referring marriage or couples counseling until the offender or abusing party has completed a domestic abuse counseling program or educational program for the minimum number of court-ordered sessions and the counselor or facilitator reasonably believes that the violence, intimidation, and coercion has ceased and the victim feels safe to participate. (k) Programs must have written policies requiring that the counselor or facilitator report when the court-ordered offender or abusing party has completed the program to the court and the offender's probation or corrections officer. (l) Programs must have written policies to coordinate with the court, probation and corrections officers, deleted text begin battered women's anddeleted text end domestic abuse programs, child protection services, and other providers on promotion of victim safety and offender accountability. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 609.101, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Minimum fines. Notwithstanding any other law, when a court sentences a person convicted of violating section 609.221, 609.222, 609.223, 609.2231, 609.224, 609.2242, 609.267, 609.2671, 609.2672, 609.342, 609.343, 609.344, or 609.345, it must impose a fine of not less than 30 percent of the maximum fine authorized by law nor more than the maximum fine authorized by law. The court shall collect the portion of the fine mandated by this subdivision and forward 70 percent of it to a local victim assistance program that provides services locally in the county in which the crime was committed. The court shall forward the remaining 30 percent to the commissioner of management and budget to be credited to the general fund. If more than one victim assistance program serves the county in which the crime was committed, the court may designate on a case-by-case basis which program will receive the fine proceeds, giving consideration to the nature of the crime committed, the types of victims served by the program, and the funding needs of the program. If no victim assistance program serves that county, the court shall forward 100 percent of the fine proceeds to the commissioner of management and budget to be credited to the general fund. Fine proceeds received by a local victim assistance program must be used to provide direct services to crime victims. The minimum fine required by this subdivision is in addition to the surcharge or assessment required by section 357.021, subdivision 6, and is in addition to any sentence of imprisonment or restitution imposed or ordered by the court. As used in this subdivision, "victim assistance program" means victim witness programs within county attorney offices or any of the following programs: crime victim crisis centers, victim-witness programs, domestic abuse deleted text begin victimdeleted text end shelters and nonshelter programs, sexual assault programs, and children's advocacy centers as defined in section 260E.02, subdivision 5. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.605, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Gross misdemeanor. Whoever trespasses upon the grounds of a facility providing emergency shelter services for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end , as defined under section 611A.31, subdivision 3, or providing comparable services for sex trafficking victims, as defined under section 609.321, subdivision 7b, or of a facility providing transitional housing for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end and their children or sex trafficking victims and their children, without claim of right or consent of one who has right to give consent, and refuses to depart from the grounds of the facility on demand of one who has right to give consent, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.7495, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given deleted text begin themdeleted text end . (a) "Facility" means any of the following: (1) a hospital or other health institution licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56; (2) a medical facility as defined in section 144.561; (3) an agency, clinic, or office operated under the direction of or under contract with the commissioner of health or a community health board, as defined in section 145A.02; (4) a facility providing counseling regarding options for medical services or recovery from an addiction; (5) a facility providing emergency shelter services for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end , as defined in section 611A.31, subdivision 3, or a facility providing transitional housing for deleted text begin battered womendeleted text end new text begin domestic abuse victimsnew text end and their children; (6) a facility as defined in section 260E.03, subdivision 6; (7) a facility as defined in section 626.5572, subdivision 6, where the services described in that paragraph are provided; (8) a place to or from which ambulance service, as defined in section 144E.001, is provided or sought to be provided; and (9) a hospice provider licensed under section 144A.753. (b) "Aggrieved party" means a person whose access to or egress from a facility is obstructed in violation of subdivision 2, or the facility. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.31, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Commissioner. "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of deleted text begin Correctionsdeleted text end new text begin Public Safetynew text end or a designee. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.72, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Electronic monitoring; condition of pretrial release. (a) Until the commissioner of corrections has adopted standards governing electronic monitoring devices used to protect victims of domestic abuse, the court, as a condition of release, may not order a person arrested for a crime described in section 609.135, subdivision 5a, paragraph (b), to use an electronic monitoring device to protect a victim's safety. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the chief judge of a judicial district may appoint and convene an advisory group comprised of representatives from law enforcement, prosecutors, defense attorneys, corrections, court administrators, judges, and deleted text begin battered women'sdeleted text end new text begin domestic abusenew text end organizations to develop standards for the use of electronic monitoring and global positioning system devices to protect victims of domestic abuse and for evaluating the effectiveness of electronic monitoring. After the advisory group does this, the chief judge, in consultation with the advisory group, may conduct a pilot project for implementation of the electronic monitoring standards. A judicial district that conducts a pilot project shall report on the standards and the pilot project to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees having jurisdiction over criminal justice policy and the state court administrator's office. Sec. 26. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must change the term "battered women" to "domestic abuse victims" or a similar term wherever the term or similar terms appear in Minnesota Statutes. The revisor must make any necessary grammatical changes or changes to sentence structure necessary to preserve the meaning of the text as a result of the changes. new text end Sec. 27. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 611A.201, subdivisions 1, 2, 4, and 5; 611A.37, subdivisions 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 8; 611A.371; 611A.372; and 611A.373, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06124 611A.201 DIRECTOR OF PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AND SEXUAL ASSAULT. Subdivision 1. Appointment of director. The executive director of the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety shall appoint a person to serve as director of domestic violence and sexual assault prevention in the office. The director must have experience in domestic violence and sexual assault prevention issues. The director serves at the executive director's pleasure in the unclassified service. The executive director may appoint, supervise, discipline, and discharge employees to assist the director in carrying out the director's responsibilities under this section. Subd. 2. Director's responsibilities. The director shall have the following duties: (1) advocate for the rights of victims of domestic violence and sexual assault; (2) increase public education and visibility about the prevention of domestic violence and sexual assault; (3) encourage accountability regarding domestic violence and sexual assault at all levels of the system, and develop recommendations to improve accountability when the system fails; (4) support prosecution and civil litigation efforts regarding domestic violence and sexual assault at the federal and state levels; (5) study issues involving domestic violence and sexual assault as they pertain to both men and women and present findings and recommendations resulting from these studies to all branches of government; (6) initiate policy changes regarding domestic violence and sexual assault at all levels of government; (7) coordinate existing resources and promote coordinated and immediate community responses to better serve victims of domestic violence and sexual assault; (8) build partnerships among law enforcement, prosecutors, defenders, advocates, and courts to reduce the occurrence of domestic violence and sexual assault; (9) encourage and support the efforts of health care providers, mental health experts, employers, educators, clergy members, and others, in raising awareness of and addressing how to prevent domestic violence and sexual assault; (10) coordinate and maximize the use of federal, state, and local resources available to prevent domestic violence and sexual assault and leverage more resources through grants and private funding; and (11) serve as a liaison between the executive director of the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety and the commissioner of health with regard to the Department of Health's sexual violence prevention program funded by federal block grants, and oversee how this money is spent. Subd. 4. Annual report. By January 15 of each year, the director shall report to the governor and the legislature on matters within the director's jurisdiction. In addition to other issues deemed relevant by the director, the report may include recommendations for changes in policies and laws relating to domestic violence and sexual assault prevention. Subd. 5. Other responsibilities. In addition to those described in this section, the executive director of the office may assign other appropriate responsibilities to the director. 611A.37 DEFINITIONS. Subdivision 1. Scope. For purposes of sections 611A.371 to 611A.375, the terms defined have the meanings given them unless otherwise provided or indicated by the context. Subd. 2. Director. "Director" means the director of the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety or a designee. Subd. 3. Office. "Office" means the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety. Subd. 4. Shelter facility. "Shelter facility" means a secure crisis shelter, housing network, safe home, or other facility operated by a nonprofit organization and designated by the center for the purpose of providing food, lodging, safety, and 24-hour coverage for battered women and their children. Subd. 5. Designated shelter facility. "Designated shelter facility" means a facility that has applied to, and been approved by, the Office of Justice Programs to provide shelter and services to battered women and their children. Subd. 8. Battered woman. "Battered woman" has the meaning given in section 611A.31, subdivision 2. 611A.371 PROGRAM OPERATION. Subdivision 1. Purpose. The purpose of the grant program is to provide reimbursement in a timely, efficient manner to local programs for the reasonable and necessary costs of providing battered women and their children with food, lodging, and safety. Grant funding may not be used for other purposes. Subd. 2. Nondiscrimination. Designated shelter facilities are prohibited from discriminating against a battered woman or her children on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, disability, or sexual orientation. Subd. 3. Data. Personal history information collected, used, or maintained by a designated shelter facility from which the identity or location of any battered woman may be determined is private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, and the facility shall maintain the data in accordance with the provisions of chapter 13. 611A.372 DUTIES OF DIRECTOR. In addition to any other duties imposed by law, the director, with the approval of the commissioner of public safety, shall: (1) supervise the administration of grant payments to designated shelter facilities; (2) collect data on shelter facilities; (3) conduct an annual evaluation of the grant program; (4) report to the governor and the legislature on the need for emergency secure shelter; (5) develop an application process for shelter facilities to follow in seeking reimbursement under the grant program; and (6) adopt rules to implement and administer sections 611A.37 to 611A.375. 611A.373 PAYMENTS. Subdivision 1. Payment. Payments to designated shelter facilities must be in the form of a grant. Designated shelter facilities may submit requests for payment monthly based on their expenses. The process for the submission of payments and for the submission of requests may be established by the director. Upon approval of the request for payment by the office, payments shall be made directly to designated shelter facilities from grant funds on behalf of women and their children who reside in the shelter facility. Payments made to a designated shelter facility must not exceed the grant amount for that facility unless approved by the director. These payments must not affect the eligibility of individuals who reside in shelter facilities for public assistance benefits, except when required by federal law or regulation. Subd. 2. Reserve grant amount. The office shall calculate the grant amount for each designated shelter facility. This calculation may be based upon program type, average occupancy rates, and licensed capacity limits. The total of all grant amounts shall not exceed the legislative appropriation. Subd. 3. Accountability. Shelter facilities must comply with reporting requirements and any other measures imposed by the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety to improve accountability and program outcomes including, but not limited to, information on all restricted or unrestricted fund balances.